Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.05
Auction dealer, defined.

Auction dealer
means any person engaged in the business of conducting an auction for the
sale of motor vehicles and trailers.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 17.